Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.19.030

Transaction excluded from chapter—Inadvertent acquisition.

This chapter does not apply to a significant business transaction of a target corporation with an acquiring person of the target corporation which became an acquiring person inadvertently, if the acquiring person (1) as soon as practicable, divests itself of a sufficient amount of the voting shares of the target corporation so that it no longer is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of voting shares entitled to cast votes comprising ten percent or more of the voting power of the target corporation, and (2) would not at any time within the five-year period preceding the announcement date of the significant business transaction have been an acquiring person but for the inadvertent acquisition.

[ 2016 c 216 s 2; 1996 c 155 s 2; 1989 c 165 s 199.]